Utah statutes.
38-1-10.   Laborers' and materialmen's lien on equal footing regardless of time of filing.

The liens for work and labor done or material furnished as provided in this chapter shall be upon an equal footing, regardless of date of filing the notice and claim of lien and regardless of the time of performing such work and labor or furnishing such material.

